Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1199.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 1 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 10LEGISLATIVE PROCEDURESec.1001. (Reserved).1002. Legislation to include original purpose.§ 1001. (Reserved).§ 1002. Legislation to include original purpose. A bill or joint resolution introduced in the General Assembly shall contain a preamble which clearly and concisely states the original purpose of the legislation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617